Florida, session 2026, HB969.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida:

Section 1. Section 381.993, Florida Statutes, is created
to read:
381.993 Developmental delays; autism spectrum disorder;
detection.—
(1) The Department of Health, in collaboration with school
districts throughout this state, shall develop informational
materials for the detection of developmental delays and autism
spectrum disorder for parents and guardians of students. The
informational materials shall be made available to each learning
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb969-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 969 2026
coalition, prekindergarten provider, school district, and
charter school through the department's website.
(2) Within 90 days after July 1, 2026, the department
shall develop the materials related to the detection of
developmental delays and autism spectrum disorder and post the
information on its website. The department shall develop a
standardized methodology for each learning coalition,
prekindergarten provider, school district, and charter school
for the notification of the parents or guardians of voluntary
prekindergarten, kindergarten, first grade, and second grade
students by September 30, 2026, and annually thereafter, of the
availability of the developmental delay and autism spectrum
disorder detection materials.
(3) Information provided to parents and guardians shall
include, but not be limited to, all of the following:
(a) A description of developmental delays and a
description of autism spectrum disorder.
(b) A description of the signs associated with
developmental delays and autism spectrum disorder.
(c) A recommendation for a developmental screening for
students displaying signs associated with developmental delays
and autism spectrum disorder.
(d) Existing state resources for students identified as
at-risk for developmental delays and autism spectrum disorder,
including, but not limited to, regional sites of the Center for
Page 2 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb969-00

F L O R I D A H O U S E O F R E P R E S E N T A T I V E S
HB 969 2026
Autism and Related Disabilities and the Early Head Start
program.
Section 2. Subsection (5) of section 1002.53, Florida
Statutes, is amended to read:
1002.53 Voluntary Prekindergarten Education Program;
eligibility and enrollment.—
(5) The early learning coalition shall provide each parent
enrolling a child in the Voluntary Prekindergarten Education
Program with a profile of every private prekindergarten provider
and public school delivering the program within the county where
the child is being enrolled. The profiles shall be provided to
parents in a format prescribed by the department in accordance
with s. 1002.92(3). The early learning coalition must also
annually notify parents and guardians of the availability of
informational materials for the early detection of Type 1
diabetes pursuant to s. 381.992 and for the detection of
developmental delays and autism spectrum disorder pursuant to s.
381.993.
Section 3. This act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Page 3 of 3
CODING: Words stricken are deletions; words underlined are additions.
hb969-00